Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE K. PROFESSIONS RELATED TO USE OF CERTAIN MEDICAL EQUIPMENT

CHAPTER 605. ORTHOTISTS AND PROSTHETISTS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 605.001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as the Orthotics and Prosthetics Act.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 605.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Advisory board" means the Orthotists and Prosthetists Advisory Board.

(2) "Commission" means the Texas Commission of Licensing and Regulation.

(3) "Custom-fabricated" means an orthosis or prosthesis designed, prescribed, fabricated, fitted, and aligned for a specific individual in accordance with sound biomechanical principles.

(4) "Custom-fitted" means an orthosis or prosthesis adjusted, prescribed, fitted, and aligned for a specific individual in accordance with sound biomechanical principles.

(5) "Department" means the Texas Department of Licensing and Regulation.

(5-a) "Executive director" means the executive director of the department.

(6) "Licensed orthotist" or "LO" means a person licensed under this chapter who practices orthotics and represents the person to the public by a title or description of services that includes the term "orthotics," "orthotist," "brace," "orthoses," "orthotic," or a similar title or description of services.

(7) "Licensed orthotist assistant" or "LOA" means a person licensed under this chapter who assists at an orthotic or prosthetic facility and is under the supervision of a licensed orthotist responsible for the acts of the assistant.

(8) "Licensed prosthetist" or "LP" means a person licensed under this chapter who practices prosthetics and represents the person to the public by a title or description of services that includes the term "prosthetics," "prosthetist," "prostheses," "prosthetic," "artificial limb," or a similar title or description of services.

(9) "Licensed prosthetist assistant" or "LPA" means a person licensed under this chapter who assists at an orthotic or prosthetic facility and is under the supervision of a licensed prosthetist responsible for the acts of the assistant.

(10) "Licensed prosthetist orthotist" or "LPO" means a person licensed under this chapter who practices both orthotics and prosthetics and represents the person to the public by a title or description of services that includes the terms "prosthetics orthotics," "prosthetist orthotist," "prosthetic orthotic," "artificial limb," "brace," or a similar title or description of services.

(11) "Licensed prosthetist orthotist assistant" or "LPOA" means a person licensed under this chapter who assists at an orthotic or prosthetic facility and is under the supervision of a licensed prosthetist orthotist or a licensed prosthetist and licensed orthotist responsible for the acts of the assistant.

(12) "Orthosis" means a custom-fabricated or custom-fitted medical device designed to provide for the support, alignment, prevention, or correction of a neuromuscular or musculoskeletal disease, injury, or deformity. The term does not include a fabric or elastic support, corset, arch support, low-temperature plastic splint, truss, elastic hose, cane, crutch, soft cervical collar, orthosis for diagnostic or evaluation purposes, dental appliance, or any other similar device carried in stock and sold by a drugstore, department store, or corset shop.

(13) "Orthotic or prosthetic facility" means a location, including a building or office, where the profession and practice of orthotics or prosthetics normally takes place.

(14) "Orthotics" means the science and practice of measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling, fitting, adjusting, or servicing an orthosis under an order from a licensed physician, chiropractor, or podiatrist, or an advanced practice nurse or physician assistant acting under the delegation and supervision of a licensed physician as provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 157, and rules adopted by the Texas Medical Board, for the correction or alleviation of a neuromuscular or musculoskeletal dysfunction, disease, injury, or deformity.

(15) "Person" means an individual, corporation, partnership, association, or other organization.

(16) "Profession of orthotics or prosthetics" means allied health care medical services used to identify, prevent, correct, or alleviate acute or chronic neuromuscular or musculoskeletal dysfunctions of the human body that support and provide rehabilitative health care services concerned with the restoration of function, prevention, or progression of disabilities resulting from disease, injury, or congenital anomalies. Orthotic and prosthetic services include direct patient care, including consultation, evaluation, treatment, education, and advice to maximize the rehabilitation potential of disabled individuals.

(17) "Prosthesis" means a custom-fabricated or custom-fitted medical device used to replace a missing limb, appendage, or other external human body part but that is not surgically implanted. The term includes an artificial limb, hand, or foot. The term does not include:

(A) an artificial eye, ear, finger, or toe;

(B) a dental appliance;

(C) a cosmetic device, including an artificial breast, eyelash, or wig; or

(D) another device that does not have a significant impact on the musculoskeletal functions of the body.

(18) "Prosthetics" means the science and practice of measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling, fitting, adjusting, or servicing a prosthesis under an order from a licensed physician, chiropractor, or podiatrist, or an advanced practice nurse or physician assistant acting under the delegation and supervision of a licensed physician as provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 157, and rules adopted by the Texas Medical Board.

(19) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1144 (H.B. 2847), Sec. 11.001(1), eff. September 1, 2019.

(20) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1144 (H.B. 2847), Sec. 11.001(1), eff. September 1, 2019.

(21) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1144 (H.B. 2847), Sec. 11.001(1), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 545 (H.B. 2703), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.209, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.318(10), eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.166, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1144 (H.B. 2847), Sec. 11.001(1), eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. ORTHOTISTS AND PROSTHETISTS ADVISORY BOARD

Sec. 605.052. ADVISORY BOARD MEMBERSHIP. (a) The advisory board consists of seven members appointed by the presiding officer of the commission with the approval of the commission as follows:

(1) two licensed orthotist members who each have practiced orthotics for the five years preceding the date of appointment;

(2) two licensed prosthetist members who each have practiced prosthetics for the five years preceding the date of appointment;

(3) one licensed prosthetist orthotist member who has practiced orthotics and prosthetics for the five years preceding the date of appointment;

(4) one member who is a representative of the public who uses an orthosis; and

(5) one member who is a representative of the public who uses a prosthesis.

(b) Appointments to the advisory board shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointee.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 30.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.168, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 605.0521. DUTIES OF ADVISORY BOARD. The advisory board shall provide advice and recommendations to the department on technical matters relevant to the administration of this chapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.169, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 605.055. TERMS; VACANCY. (a) Members of the advisory board serve staggered six-year terms. The terms of two or three members expire on February 1 of each odd-numbered year.

(b) If a vacancy occurs during a member's term, the presiding officer of the commission, with the commission's approval, shall appoint a replacement who meets the qualifications for the vacant position to serve for the remainder of the term.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 30.02, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.170, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 605.056. PRESIDING OFFICER. The presiding officer of the commission, with the commission's approval, shall designate a member of the advisory board to serve as the presiding officer of the advisory board for a term of one year. The presiding officer of the advisory board may vote on any matter before the advisory board.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.171, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 4007), Sec. 7.001, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 605.059. MEETINGS. (a) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(157), eff. September 1, 2015.

(b) The advisory board shall meet at the call of the presiding officer of the commission or the executive director.

(c) Four or more advisory board members may call a special meeting of the advisory board by providing written notice not less than 14 days before the date of the meeting to:

(1) the presiding officer of the commission;

(2) the executive director; and

(3) all other members of the advisory board.

(d) Not more than two special meetings of the advisory board may be called under Subsection (c) in a calendar year.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.172, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.222(157), eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER D. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 605.151. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The executive director shall administer and enforce this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.343(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.173, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 605.155. EXAMINATIONS. The department must approve any examination required for a license under this chapter. Each examination shall be offered at least once each year.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.174, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER F. LICENSE, REGISTRATION, AND ACCREDITATION REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 605.251. LICENSE REQUIRED. A person may not practice, attempt to practice, or offer to practice orthotics or prosthetics, act as an assistant to a person who practices orthotics or prosthetics, or in any way hold the person out as being able to practice orthotics or prosthetics unless the person holds a license under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.178, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 605.2515. ADDITIONAL LICENSE: DEVICE MANUFACTURER. A person licensed to practice orthotics or prosthetics who measures, designs, fabricates, fits, assembles, adjusts, or services an orthosis or a prosthesis under an order from a licensed physician, chiropractor, or podiatrist, or an advanced practice nurse or physician assistant acting under the delegation and supervision of a licensed physician as provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 157, and rules adopted by the Texas Medical Board, for a specific patient is exempt from licensing as a device manufacturer under Subchapter L, Chapter 431, Health and Safety Code. A person licensed to practice orthotics or prosthetics who fabricates or assembles an orthosis or a prosthesis without an order from a licensed physician, chiropractor, or podiatrist, or an advanced practice nurse or physician assistant acting under the delegation and supervision of a licensed physician as provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 157, and rules adopted by the Texas Medical Board, for a specific patient is required to be licensed as a device manufacturer under Subchapter L, Chapter 431, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 220 (S.B. 1271), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 545 (H.B. 2703), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 605.252. LICENSE ELIGIBILITY.

(a) To be eligible for a license to practice orthotics or prosthetics in this state, a person must:

(1) submit an application in the manner and on the form prescribed by the executive director;

(2) pay the nonrefundable application fee;

(3) have completed formal training, including the required hours of classroom education and clinical practice, in an area of study the commission by rule determines to be necessary and appropriate;

(4) have completed a clinical residency in the professional area for which a license is sought that complies with the standards, guidelines, or procedures established by the department for a clinical residency that is offered in this state or another state; and

(5) have passed each written and practical examination approved and required by the department.

(b) The requirements for a license established by commission rule must include the requirement that the applicant hold:

(1) a bachelor's or graduate degree in orthotics and prosthetics from:

(A) an education program recognized and accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs that is offered at an institution of higher education; or

(B) a practitioner education program that has education standards that are equivalent to or exceed the standards adopted by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs; or

(2) a bachelor's degree in another subject and an orthotic or prosthetic certificate issued by a practitioner education program:

(A) recognized and accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs; or

(B) that has education standards that are equivalent to or exceed the standards adopted by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs.

(c) To meet the clinical residency requirements for a license, the applicant must complete a professional clinical residency that meets the requirements established by commission rule and is conducted under the direct supervision of a licensed orthotist, licensed prosthetist, or a licensed prosthetist orthotist in the discipline for which licensure is sought. The clinical residency requirements adopted by the commission must be equivalent to or exceed the standards set by the National Commission on Orthotic and Prosthetic Education.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 4007), Sec. 7.006(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 511 (S.B. 141), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.179, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 4007), Sec. 7.002, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 4007), Sec. 7.006(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 605.254. EXEMPTIONS FROM OR SUBSTITUTES FOR LICENSE REQUIREMENTS. (a) A person is entitled to an exemption from the license requirements established under Section 605.252 if the person presents evidence satisfactory to the department that the person possesses unique qualifications to practice orthotics, prosthetics, or orthotics and prosthetics.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(169), eff. September 1, 2015.

(c) The department shall issue a license to a person who is determined to be eligible for a license under Subsection (a). A person to whom a license is issued under this subsection is entitled to the same license privileges as if the person met the educational and vocational requirements of Section 605.252. The license holder is subject to the license renewal requirements established by the commission, other than the academic, clinical training, and examination requirements, which the commission may not impose as a condition of the person's license.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.180, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.222(169), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 4007), Sec. 7.003, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 605.255. ASSISTANT LICENSE. (a) An applicant for a license as an orthotist assistant or prosthetist assistant must:

(1) submit an application in the manner and on a form prescribed by the executive director;

(2) pay the nonrefundable application fee established by the commission by rule; and

(3) present evidence satisfactory to the department that the applicant has completed an education program, including courses in the anatomical, biological, and physical sciences, and a clinical residency as prescribed and adopted by the commission by rule.

(b) An assistant licensed under this section may provide only ancillary patient care services, as defined by the commission by rule, in the discipline in which the assistant's supervisor is licensed under this chapter.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(170), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.181, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.222(170), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 605.256. ISSUANCE OF LICENSE OR REGISTRATION CERTIFICATE; TERM. (a) The department may issue a license or registration certificate under this chapter only to an individual.

(b) The department shall issue a license in orthotics or prosthetics to an applicant who meets the requirements provided under this chapter. A license may be granted in either orthotics or prosthetics, or in both, if the person meets the requirements established by the department.

(c) A license is valid for two years from the date issued and may be renewed before expiration.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.182, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 605.257. TEMPORARY LICENSE. (a) The department may issue a temporary license to an individual who:

(1) has applied for a license as an orthotist, prosthetist, or both;

(2) has regularly practiced orthotics, prosthetics, or both for the five years preceding the date of the application; and

(3) has been licensed by a state that has license requirements that are equal to or exceed the requirements of this chapter.

(b) A temporary license is valid for one year from the date issued. A temporary license may be renewed for not more than one additional year if the applicant presents evidence sufficient to the department of good cause for renewal.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.183, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 4007), Sec. 7.004, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 605.258. STUDENT REGISTRATION CERTIFICATE. (a) The department may issue a student registration certificate to an individual who is working toward fulfilling the requirements for a license as an orthotist, prosthetist, or prosthetist orthotist and:

(1) holds either:

(A) a bachelor's or graduate degree in orthotics and prosthetics from:

(i) an education program recognized and accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs that is offered at an institution of higher education; or

(ii) a practitioner education program that has education standards that are equivalent to or exceed the standards adopted by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs; or

(B) a bachelor's degree in another subject and an orthotic or prosthetic certificate issued by a practitioner education program:

(i) recognized and accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs; or

(ii) that has education standards that are equivalent to or exceed the standards adopted by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs; or

(2) is a student who:

(A) is currently enrolled in a graduate program in this state in orthotics and prosthetics that:

(i) is recognized and accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs; and

(ii) incorporates a professional clinical residency that meets the requirements of rules adopted under Section 605.252(c); and

(B) submits to the department a written certification from the graduate program in which the student is enrolled that the student has successfully completed the academic prerequisites to enter a professional clinical residency.

(b) A student registrant may work only under the direct supervision of a licensed orthotist, licensed prosthetist, or licensed prosthetist orthotist who is responsible for the acts of the student registrant and licensed in the discipline of the student registrant's clinical residency.

(c) A student registration certificate is valid for two years from the date issued and may be renewed once for an additional two years.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 511 (S.B. 141), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.184, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 605.260. ACCREDITATION OF FACILITIES. (a) The commission by rule shall establish requirements for the accreditation and the renewal of an accreditation of an orthotic or prosthetic facility in which orthotics or prosthetics are conducted. The department may issue an accreditation only to an orthotic or prosthetic facility.

(b) If a person owns more than one facility, the department may require only one application for the accreditation of each of the person's facilities. Each orthotic or prosthetic facility must meet the requirements established by commission rule.

(c) An orthotic or prosthetic facility must be under the on-site direction of an orthotist or prosthetist licensed by the department in the discipline for which accreditation is sought.

(d) The rules adopted under this section may not prohibit a licensed individual from practicing in an orthotic or prosthetic facility within the scope of the individual's license.

(e) This section does not apply to a facility licensed under Subtitle B, Title 4, Health and Safety Code.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.186, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER G. EXEMPTIONS

Sec. 605.301. EXEMPTION FOR LICENSE HOLDERS OF OTHER STATE AGENCIES. This chapter does not restrict a person who holds a license issued by another state agency from performing health care services within the scope of the license holder's applicable licensing act if the license holder:

(1) practices in conformance with the applicable laws and rules relating to the person's license; and

(2) does not:

(A) violate Section 605.251;

(B) represent to others that the license holder practices orthotics or prosthetics; or

(C) use the terms "prosthetist," "prosthesis," "prosthetic," "artificial limb," "orthotist," "orthosis," "orthotic," or "brace" or the letters "LP," "LPA," "LO," "LOA," "LPO," or "LPOA" or any derivative of those terms or letters in connection with the license holder's name or practice.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 605.302. EXEMPTION FOR STUDENTS IN ORTHOTICS OR PROSTHETICS. This chapter does not apply to the activities and services of a student in orthotics or prosthetics who is:

(1) pursuing a course of study in:

(A) an orthotic or prosthetic program at a college or university recognized and accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs; or

(B) an orthotic or prosthetic education program having education standards that are equivalent to or exceed the standards adopted by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs; or

(2) working in a recognized training center or research facility, if the activities and services provided by the person at the training center or research facility constitute a part of the person's course of study in the discipline in which the person's supervisor is licensed under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 605.303. EXEMPTION FOR CERTAIN LICENSE HOLDERS. This chapter does not apply to:

(1) a podiatrist practicing under Chapter 202;

(2) a chiropractor practicing under Chapter 201;

(3) an occupational therapist practicing under Chapter 454; or

(4) a physical therapist practicing under Chapter 453.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 605.304. EXEMPTION FOR PEDORTHISTS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Certified pedorthist" means a person certified by the Board for Certification in Pedorthics in the design, manufacture, fit, and modification of shoes and related foot orthoses below the anatomical ankle joint as prescribed by a licensed doctor of medicine or a doctor of podiatry for the amelioration of a painful or disabling condition of the foot; and

(2) "Foot orthosis" includes prosthetic toe fillers or orthoses for use below the ankle.

(b) This chapter does not apply to a certified pedorthist.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 605.305. EXEMPTION FOR PHARMACISTS. A pharmacist licensed by the Texas State Board of Pharmacy or a person who is working under the direct supervision of a pharmacist may practice orthotics. This chapter does not preclude a pharmacist from being reimbursed by a state-funded program for providing orthotic services.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER H. PROHIBITED PRACTICES

Sec. 605.351. USE OF TITLE. A person or an employee, agent, or representative of the person may not use in connection with the person's name or business activities the terms or a combination of the terms or letters described in Section 605.301(2), indicate orally or in writing, directly or by implication, that an orthotic or prosthetic service is provided or supplied, or extend or provide orthotic or prosthetic services unless the person is an orthotist or prosthetist or an assistant to an orthotist or prosthetist licensed under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 605.352. VIOLATION OF SECTION 102.001. A person licensed under this chapter is considered to have violated this chapter if the person violates Section 102.001.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.827, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.